Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201879-870
Commission; board; witnesses; subpoena; commissioner; issue writs of subpoena; board; modify or quash.

In the performance of their functions under sections 79-859 to 79-871, the commission and the board may subpoena witnesses and place them under oath. The commissioner may issue writs of subpoena, including subpoena duces tecum, requiring the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, records, and documents, and place witnesses under oath to take sworn testimony as part of any investigation. The board may modify or quash any subpoena issued by the commissioner.

Laws 1967, c. 549, § 6, p. 1814;

Laws 1992, LB 1001, § 29;

Laws 1993, LB 348, § 40;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1285;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 495;

Laws 2018, LB1081, § 10.